Utah statutes.
61-2-27.   Exclusive brokerage agreement.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Client" means a person who makes an exclusive brokerage agreement with a
principal broker under Subsection (1)(c).
(b)  "Closed" means that:
(i)  all documents required to be executed under the contract are executed;
(ii)  all monies required to be paid by either party under the contract are
paid in the form of collected or cleared funds;
(iii)  the proceeds of any new loan are delivered by the lender to the seller;
and
(iv)  all applicable documents are recorded in the office of the county
recorder for the county in which the property is located.
(c)  "Exclusive brokerage agreement" means a written agreement between a
client and a principal broker:
(i) (A)  to list for sale, lease, or exchange:
(I)  real estate;
(II)  an option on real estate; or
(III)  an improvement on real estate; or
(B)  for representation in the purchase, lease, or exchange of:
(I)  real estate;
(II)  an option on real estate; or
(III)  an improvement on real estate;
(ii)  that gives the principal broker the sole right to act as the agent or
representative of the client for the purchase, sale, lease, or exchange of:
(A)  real estate;
(B)  an option on real estate; or
(C)  an improvement on real estate; and
(iii)  that gives the principal broker the expectation of receiving valuable
consideration in exchange for the principal broker's services.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a principal broker subject
to an exclusive brokerage agreement shall:
(i)  accept delivery of and present to the client offers and counteroffers to
buy, lease, or exchange the client's property;
(ii)  assist the client in developing, communicating, and presenting offers,
counteroffers, and notices; and
(iii)  answer any question the client has concerning:
(A)  an offer;
(B)  a counteroffer;
(C)  a notice; and
(D)  a contingency.
(b)  A principal broker subject to an exclusive brokerage agreement need not
comply with Subsection (2)(a) after:
(i)  an agreement for the sale, lease, or exchange of the real estate, option
on real estate, or improvement on real estate is:
(A)  signed;
(B)  all contingencies related to the sale, lease, or exchange are satisfied
or waived; and
(C)  the sale, lease, or exchange is closed; or
(ii)  the exclusive brokerage agreement expires or terminates.
(3)  A principal broker who violates this section is subject to Section
61-2-17.
